Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-804
Sale of entity; report required; penalty; waiver.

Any sale of a public service entity as defined in section 77-801.01 shall be reported by the purchaser to the Property Tax Administrator within thirty days from the date of the sale. The purchaser shall identify the seller, the date of the sale, any change in name of the entity, and the purchase price of the entity. If additional information regarding the sale is needed by the Property Tax Administrator, a specific written request shall be made. For each day's failure to furnish the information, an entity may be assessed a penalty in the amount of one hundred dollars, except that the penalty shall not exceed ten thousand dollars. Such penalty shall be collected by the Tax Commissioner and credited to the Department of Revenue Property Assessment Division Cash Fund. The Tax Commissioner may waive all or part of the penalty provided in this section.

Laws 1987, LB 508, § 27;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 90;

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 44;

Laws 1999, LB 36, § 18;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 51.